Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-951
State colleges; priorities.

The state colleges, collectively and individually, shall have as their first instructional priority the provision of baccalaureate general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate professional degree programs in education. The colleges' second instructional priority shall be master's programs in education and other areas authorized by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414. Such colleges' third priority shall be the continuation and development of applied research and public service activities. The colleges' fourth priority shall be the awarding of the specialist degree in education.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 35;

Laws 1984, LB 970, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 10.
July 21, 2022